District of Columbia statutes.
16-905

Revocation and enlargement of decree of legal separation.

(a)

The court may revoke its decree of legal separation at any time, upon the joint application of the parties to be discharged from the operation of the decree.

(b)

The court may enlarge its decree of legal separation to an absolute divorce upon application of the party to whom the decree of legal separation was granted, a copy of which application shall be duly served upon the adverse party, if the court finds on the basis of affidavits that no reconciliation has taken place or is probable and that a separation has continued voluntarily and without interruption for a six-month period or without interruption for a period of one year.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 561
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 103, 23 DCR 8737
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-207, § 2(c), 49 DCR 7827

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-905.
1973 Ed., § 16-905.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-207, in subsec. (a), substituted “legal separation” for “divorce from bed and board”.